Arkansas, session 2025, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-21-136 is amended to read as follows:
16-21-136. The Fourteenth Judicial District.
The Fourteenth Judicial District shall be a Division B A Judicial
"District.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current caseload of the
Fourteenth Judicial District is burdensome for a part-time prosecuting
attorney; that the prosecuting attorney for the Fourteenth Judicial District
should be employed on a full-time basis; and that this act is immediately
necessary to ensure the efficient administration of justice in the Fourteenth
Judicial District. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act
being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on:
*CEB030*
01-22-2025 09:16:44 CEB030

As Engrossed: H1/22/25 HB1006
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto."


/s/Painter



























01-22-2025 09:16:44 CEB030